District of Columbia statutes.
31-4111

Duty of agents or brokers to obtain license.

(a)

No person, firm, association, or corporation shall act or aid in any manner in soliciting, negotiating, or procuring liability insurance in the District from a risk retention group unless the person, firm, association, or corporation is licensed as an insurance agent or broker in accordance with the District of Columbia insurance licensing laws.

(b)

(1)

No person, firm, association, or corporation shall act or aid in any manner in soliciting, negotiating, or procuring liability insurance in the District for a purchasing group from an authorized insurer or a risk retention group chartered in a state unless the person, firm, association, or corporation is licensed as an insurance agent or broker in accordance with the District of Columbia insurance licensing laws.

(2)

No person, firm, association, or corporation shall act or aid in any manner in soliciting, negotiating, or procuring liability insurance coverage in the District for any member of a purchasing group under a purchasing group’s policy unless the person, firm, association, or corporation is licensed as an insurance agent or broker in accordance with the District of Columbia insurance licensing laws.

(3)

No person, firm, association, or corporation shall act or aid in any manner in soliciting, negotiating, or procuring liability insurance from an insurer not authorized to do business in the District on behalf of a purchasing group located in this state unless the person, firm, association, or corporation is licensed as a surplus lines agent or excess line broker in accordance with the District of Columbia insurance licensing laws.

(c)

For purposes of acting as an agent or broker for a risk retention or purchasing group pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the requirement of residence in the District shall not apply.

(d)

Every person, firm, association, or corporation licensed pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 28 of Title 47, on business placed with risk retention groups or written through a purchasing group, shall inform each prospective insured of the provisions of the notice required by § 31-4108(b) in the case of a risk retention group and § 31-4107(c) in the case of a purchasing group.

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-46, § 12, 40 DCR 6082
Feb. 27, 1996, D.C. Law 11-90, § 3(g), 42 DCR 7155
This section is referenced in § 31-4103.
1981 Ed., § 35-2911.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(g) of Insurance Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 11-36, September 8, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 5305).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 3(g) of the Insurance Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-48, May 15, 1995, 42 DCR 2544) and § 3(g) of the Insurance Omnibus Congressional Recess Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-97, July 19, 1995, 42 DCR 3844).